West Virginia, session 2025, HB2038.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 2. WILDLIFE RESOURCES. §20-2-56b. Upland game bird stamp. (a) There is hereby created an "upland game bird" stamp that may be purchased alongside a standard hunting license for the purpose of hunting upland game birds in West Virginia.(b) "Upland game birds" are defined as ruffed grouse, bobwhite quail, ring necked pheasant, woodcock and snipe. The definition of upland game birds may be modified by the West Virginia Division of Natural Resources.(c) The cost of the upland game bird stamp shall be $10, and the proceeds of the stamp shall be used by the West Virginia Division of Natural Resources to purchase and release upland game birds into West Virginia Wildlife Management Areas.(d) The Director shall be responsible for administering the upland game bird stamp.